District of Columbia statutes.
24-281

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Commissary” means a system through which inmates in District correctional facilities are able to purchase permitted commodities.

(2)

“Committee” means the Inmate Welfare Fund Committee established by section 3005 [§ 24-284].

(3)

“Correctional facility” means any building, or group of buildings, and concomitant services, operated as a single management unit by, or under contract with, the Department of Corrections for the purpose of housing and providing services to persons ordered confined pending trial or upon conviction and sentencing for a violation of law.

(4)

“Department” means the Department of Corrections.

(5)

“Director” means the Director of the Department of Corrections.

(6)

“Fund” means the Inmate Welfare Fund established by § 24-282.

Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-192, § 3002, 53 DCR 6899

History

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3002 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-477, August 8, 2006, 53 DCR 7068).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3002 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-499, October 23, 2006, 53 DCR 8845).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3002 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-1, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1165).

Emergency Legislation

Short title: Section 3001 of D.C. Law 16-192 provided that subtitle A of title III of the act may be cited as the “Inmate Welfare Fund Establishment Act of 2006”.

Short Title